Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 3. State Institutions

Cross references. —

For Wyoming Funds Consolidation Act, see art. 2 of this chapter.

As to state institutions generally, see title 25.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

81A C.J.S. States §§ 223 to 229.

§ 9-4-301.
Payment of expenses of charitable institutions; general fund.

Where special provision is not otherwise made by law the expenses of supporting the state charitable institutions shall be paid out of the general fund.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 105, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 1835; C.S. 1910, § 2480; C.S. 1920, § 2943; R.S. 1931, § 115-902; C.S. 1945, § 20-301; W.S. 1957, § 9-558; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-601; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 9-4-302.
Payment of expenses of charitable institutions; special county tax.

Whenever it appears to the state board of equalization that there will not be sufficient money in the general fund to pay the expenses of supporting the state charitable institutions in addition to paying the other expenses authorized to be paid from the general fund by legislative appropriation, the board of equalization, at the time of making the annual assessment for state purposes, may direct the boards of county commissioners of the several counties to levy on all taxable property a special tax not exceeding one (1) mill on each dollar of the assessed valuation thereof, for the purpose of raising sufficient money which, together with the money available therefor in the general fund, is sufficient to pay the expenses of supporting the state charitable institutions as authorized by the legislature. The money raised by the special tax shall be credited to the general fund.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 105, §§ 2, 3; R.S. 1899, § 1836; C.S. 1910, § 2481; C.S. 1920, § 2944; R.S. 1931, § 115-903; C.S. 1945, § 20-302; W.S. 1957, § 9-559; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-602; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 9-4-303.
Payment of monies and income into state treasury.

Except as otherwise provided by law, all monies and income received or collected by any public institution of this state for the care of patients therein, for the maintenance of prisoners therein, or as compensation for any matter whatsoever, received from the institution, shall be paid into the state treasury as frequently as their procedure and their location will permit and credited to the general fund and shall not be paid out except in pursuance of a lawful appropriation. The legislature may provide for the deposit of monies and income received or collected by any public institution of this state into other accounts provided those funds shall be expended to further the mission of the public institution as provided by law.

Except as otherwise provided by law all monies donated to any public institution or organization belonging to the state, whether educational, charitable, military or of other public nature, and any and all monies donated to the state for the use or benefit of the institutions and organizations shall be deposited in the state treasury in the appropriate accounts and shall not be withdrawn except in the manner provided in W.S.

9-4-304

. The legislature may provide for the deposit of monies donated to any public institution or organization of this state into a separate fund provided those monies shall be expended to further the mission of the public institution or organization as provided by law.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 86, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 1837; C.S. 1910, § 2482; C.S. 1920, § 2945; Laws 1921, ch. 43, § 1; R.S. 1931, §§ 108-101, 115-904; C.S. 1945, §§ 20-303, 20-304; W.S. 1957, § 9-560; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1974, ch. 16, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-603; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2017 ch. 54, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (b), substituted “the appropriate accounts” for “accounts within the trust and agency fund.”

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, added the last sentence of (a) and (b).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Law reviews. —

For article, “School Finance Reform in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1984).

§ 9-4-304.
Disbursement of monies from state treasury.

No monies deposited in the state treasury for the purposes specified in W.S. 9-4-303(b) and

9-4-306

shall be expended or disbursed except upon itemized claims, and the itemized claims shall be approved for payment by the respective boards of trustees, or other boards or officers under whose authority the monies are by law authorized to be disbursed. The itemized claims shall then be audited by the state auditor, who, if satisfied that the monies are being properly disbursed according to law, shall issue his warrant for the amounts of the claims. The warrants shall be paid by the state treasurer out of the particular fund or account on which the warrants are drawn.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 43, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 108-102; C.S. 1945, § 20-305; W.S. 1957, § 9-561; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-604; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 9-4-305.
Disposition of state land revenue.

Any and all funds accruing from state lands set aside for the benefit or use of any public institution or organization specified in W.S.

9-4-303

shall be deposited in the state treasury.

Proceeds from the sale of state lands, mineral royalties and any money designated by the Wyoming constitution or Wyoming statutes as collected shall be transmitted to the state treasurer and credited to the proper accounts within the permanent land fund. As authorized by article 7, section 2 of the Wyoming constitution, thirty-three and one-third percent (33 1/3%) of the mineral royalties received from the lease of any school lands shall be deposited into the school lands mineral royalties account. To the extent constitutionally permissible and notwithstanding any other provision of law, at the end of every fiscal year, the state treasurer shall transfer to the corpus of each account within the permanent land fund, except the common school account, from the income earned on the corresponding account within the permanent land fund, to the extent available, an amount as provided by this subsection. In determining the amount to be withheld, the state treasurer shall calculate the fiscal year beginning balance and ignore any appropriations made from the account within that fiscal year. For the fiscal year 2000, he shall transfer an amount equal to five percent (5%) of the inflation rate for the previous twelve (12) month period as determined by the department of administration and information multiplied by the beginning balance of each permanent land fund account, except the common school account. At the end of each succeeding fiscal year, the state treasurer shall increase the amount to be multiplied by that year’s inflation rate by five percent (5%) until such time as the multiplier reaches one hundred percent (100%) of the inflation rate, and then multiply that amount by the beginning balance of each permanent land fund account, except the common school account.[

Except as provided by subsection (b) of this section, rentals for the ordinary use of the state lands, bonuses, interest on purchase money, interest from investment of money in corresponding accounts within the permanent land fund, and any money designated by the Wyoming constitution or Wyoming statutes as collected shall be transmitted to the state treasurer and credited to the proper accounts within the permanent land income fund or to the general fund as provided by the Wyoming Funds Consolidation Act and W.S.

9-4-311

.

The institutional land revenue fund created in 2013 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 155, Section 2 is hereby continued and codified and shall consist of funds from transactions involving institutional lands under W.S. 9-2-2005(g), 9-2-2006(e) and 9-2-2012(e) for which disposition is not otherwise provided for by state or federal law or the conveyance instrument. The state auditor shall account for funds deposited in the account attributable to each department. Funds in the account attributable to each individual department shall not be commingled. The state treasurer shall invest funds within the fund and shall deposit the earnings from fund investments to the general fund. Funds in the account shall only be appropriated:

Upon further action of the legislature; and

To support major maintenance, capital construction for institutions of the department to which the funds are attributable and reasonable administrative expenses.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 43, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 108-103; C.S. 1945, § 20-306; W.S. 1957, § 9-562; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1974, ch. 16, §§ 2, 3; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-605; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1994, ch. 100, § 2; 1997, ch. 200, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 80, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2007, ch. 33, § 1; 2018 ch. 134, § 315(a), effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 204, § 3, § 3, effective July 1, 2020; 2022 ch. 66, § 1, effective March 15, 2022.

Cross references. —

As to state capital construction assistance, see §

21-15-111

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (b), deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” from the end of the first sentence.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a) through (c) substituted “state” for “public” or variants of.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (b), inserted “except as provided in this section for fiscal years 2019 and 2020” in the first sentence and added the second sentence.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (b), substituted "land fund. As authorized by" for "land fund, except as provided by" and "school lands shall be deposited into the school lands mineral royalties account" for "school lands but not to exceed eight million dollars ($8,000,000.00) during any one (1) year except as provided in this section for fiscal years 2019 and 2020, shall be deposited into the public school capital construction account. For fiscal years 2019 and 2020, up to the amount allowed by article 7, section 2 of the Wyoming constitution shall be deposited into the public school capital construction account under this section."

The 2022 amendment

added (d).

Laws 2022, ch. 66, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 15, 2022.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Law reviews. —

For article, “School Finance Reform in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1984).

§ 9-4-306.
University building account.

The state treasurer may create and maintain an account into which he shall place all monies received for the purpose of constructing and maintaining buildings at the University of Wyoming. He shall draw from the account only the sums which have been authorized by the board of trustees of the university and audited by the state auditor as provided in W.S.

9-4-304

.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 43, § 6; R.S. 1931, § 108-105; C.S. 1945, § 20-308; W.S. 1957, § 9-564; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-606; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to distribution of government royalty revenue to the University of Wyoming, see §§

9-4-601

and

9-4-602

.

§ 9-4-307.
Crediting of federal land grant income; omnibus account.

Three-fourths (3/4) of the income described in W.S. 9-4-305(c) attributable to the lands now remaining undistributed, as donated to the state for state, charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions under section 11 of the Act of Admission, shall be credited to the general fund, and one-fourth (1/4) of that income shall be credited to the omnibus account within the permanent land income fund for the department of corrections, the department of health and the department of family services.

The omnibus account is an emergency account to be used by the department of corrections, the department of health and the department of family services in the maintenance and upbuilding of state charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions upon the unanimous vote of the state loan and investment board at a meeting attended by all board members or following an appropriation by the legislature.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 9-565.1; Laws 1974, ch. 16, §§ 2, 3; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-607; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; ch. 96, § 2; 1998, ch. 13, § 1.

Cross references. —

For the Act of Admission, see volume 1, Wyoming Statutes Annotated.

§ 9-4-308.
Crediting of federal land grant income; university account.

The income described in W.S. 9-4-305(c) attributable to the lands granted to the state for university purposes under section 8 of the Act of Admission shall be credited to the university account within the permanent land income fund for the University of Wyoming, and shall be paid by the state treasurer to the treasurer of the university upon the request of the board of trustees of the university to be used for the support and maintenance of the University of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 9-565.2; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-608; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

For the Act of Admission, see Volume 1, Wyoming Statutes Annotated.

§ 9-4-309.
Crediting of federal land grant income; game and fish fund.

The income described in W.S. 9-4-305(c) attributable to the lands granted to the state for a state fish hatchery under sections 8 and 11 of the Act of Admission shall be credited to the game and fish fund.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 9-565.3; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-609; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

For the Act of Admission, see Volume 1, Wyoming Statutes Annotated.

§ 9-4-310.
Permanent land fund and land income fund accounts.

The following accounts within the permanent land fund are established to account for revenue dedicated to certain institutions or for certain purposes accruing from grants of land contained in the Act of Admission or acts of congress, or accruing from provisions of the Wyoming constitution or Wyoming statutes:

Deaf, dumb and blind account;

Public buildings account;

State hospital account (formerly the insane asylum account);

Penitentiary account;

Poor farm account;

Agricultural college account;

Common school account;

Fish hatchery account;

Miner’s hospital account;

Omnibus account;

University account;

Carey Act account.

No appropriation shall be made from the agricultural college, common school or university accounts within the permanent land fund.

The following accounts within the permanent land income fund are established to be expended as provided by law:

Agricultural college account;

Common school account;

University account;

Omnibus account;

Miner’s hospital account.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 9-565.4; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-610; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1984, ch. 64, § 200.

Cross references. —

For the Act of Admission, see Volume 1, Wyoming Statutes Annotated.

As to creation of miner's hospital board account, see §

30-6-102

.

§ 9-4-311.
Carey Act revenue.

The state treasurer shall create and maintain an account within the permanent land fund. He shall deposit in the account:

All proceeds from the sale of lands acquired from the United States of America pursuant to Public Law 582, enacted by the United States congress August 13, 1954 (68 Stat. 703);

All royalties received from oil and gas and other minerals in the lands; and

All proceeds from the sale of any and all other materials in the lands which might not be classified as mineral.

The income received from investments of the account shall be deposited by the state treasurer in the emergency water projects account as provided in W.S. 41-2-124(f), provided that anytime the unencumbered, unobligated balance in the emergency water projects account equals or exceeds ten million dollars ($10,000,000.00) the income received from investments shall be deposited in the general fund. All monies derived from rentals of the lands acquired under Public Law 582 (68 Stat. 703) and from timber sales therefrom shall be deposited by the state treasurer in the general fund, and shall be expended therefrom only upon appropriation.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 177,§ 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-503.2; Laws 1973, ch. 245,§ 3; W.S. 1977, §

9-7-102

; Laws 1982, ch. 62,§ 3; 2020 ch. 127, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (b) substituted “income received” for “interest received” and “account shall be deposited by the state treasurer in the emergency water projects account as provided in W.S. 41-2-124(f), provided that anytime the unencumbered, unobligated balance in the emergency water projects account equals or exceeds ten million dollars ($10,000,000.00) the income received from investments shall be deposited in the general fund. All monies” for “account, and all monies.”